Missouri, session 2026, HB1748.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 135.714, 151.150, 163.011, and 166.131, RSMo, are repealed and
four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 135.714, 151.150, 163.011,
and 166.131, to read as follows:
135.714. 1. Each educational assistance organization shall:
(1) Notify the state treasurer of such organization's intent to provide scholarship
accounts to qualified students;
(2) Demonstrate to the state treasurer that such organization is exempt from federal
income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) Provide a state treasurer-approved receipt to taxpayers for contributions made to
the organization;
(4) Ensure that grants are distributed to scholarship accounts of qualified students in
the following order:
(a) Qualified students who received a scholarship grant in the previous school year;
(b) Qualified students who are siblings of qualified students who will receive a
scholarship grant in the current school year;
(c) Qualified students that have an approved "individualized education [plan]
program" (IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act
(IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, or who have been diagnosed with
dyslexia, as the term "dyslexia" is defined in section 633.420;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1748 2
(d) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch as approved by the department
of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations and who reside
in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school district;
(e) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced price lunch as approved by the
department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations and
who reside in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school district;
(f) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch as approved by the department
of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(g) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced price lunch as approved by the
department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(h) Qualified students who are active duty military dependents who have relocated to
Missouri and are enrolling in a school in the state for the first time; and
(i) All other qualified students;
(5) Ensure that:
(a) One hundred percent of such organization's revenues from interest or investments
is spent on scholarship accounts;
(b) At least ninety percent of such organization's revenues from qualifying
contributions is spent on scholarship accounts; and
(c) Marketing and administrative expenses do not exceed the following limits of such
organization's remaining revenue from contributions:
a. Ten percent for the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
b. Eight percent for the next five hundred thousand dollars; and
c. Three percent thereafter;
(6) (a) Distribute scholarship account payments either four times per year or in a
single lump sum at the beginning of the year as requested by the parent of a qualified student,
based on the state adequacy target as defined in section 163.011 and calculated by the
department of elementary and secondary education, subject to the following total grant
amount limits:
a. For a qualified student who meets the criteria to be included in a school district's
limited English proficiency pupil count as set forth in subdivision [(8)] (9)of section 163.011,
not more than one hundred sixty percent of the state adequacy target;
b. For a qualified student who is eligible for free or reduced price lunch as approved
by the department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal
regulations, not more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the state adequacy target;
c. For a qualified student who has an approved individualized education [plan]
programdeveloped under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20

HB 1748 3
U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, not more than one hundred seventy-five percent of
the state adequacy target; and
d. For all other qualified students, not more than the state adequacy target;
(b) Scholarship account payments distributed under this subdivision shall be in the
form of a deposit into the scholarship account of the qualified student;
(7) Provide the state treasurer, upon request, with criminal background checks on all
such organization's employees and board members and exclude from employment or
governance any individual who might reasonably pose a risk to the appropriate use of
contributed funds;
(8) Demonstrate such organization's financial accountability by:
(a) Submitting to the state treasurer annual audit financial statements by a certified
public accountant within six months of the end of the educational assistance organization's
fiscal year; and
(b) Having an auditor certify that the report is free of material misstatements; and
(9) Ensure that participating students take the state achievement tests or nationally
norm-referenced tests that measure learning gains in math and English language arts, and
provide for value-added assessment, in grades that require testing under the statewide
assessment system set forth in section 160.518;
(10) Allow costs of the testing requirements to be covered by the scholarships
distributed by the educational assistance organization;
(11) Provide the parents of each student who was tested with a copy of the results of
the tests on an annual basis, beginning with the first year of testing;
(12) Provide the test results to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and
secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 on an annual basis,
beginning with the first year of testing;
(13) Report student information that would allow the state treasurer, the department
of elementary and secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 to
aggregate data by grade level, gender, family income level, and race;
(14) Provide rates of high school graduation, college attendance, and college
graduation for participating students to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and
secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 in a manner consistent with
nationally recognized standards;
(15) Provide to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and secondary
education, and the board established in section 135.715 the results from an annual parental
satisfaction survey, including information about the number of years that the parent's child
has participated in the scholarship program. The annual satisfaction survey shall ask parents
of scholarship students to express:

HB 1748 4
(a) Their level of satisfaction with the child's academic achievement, including
academic achievement at the schools the child attends through the scholarship program versus
academic achievement at the school previously attended;
(b) Their level of satisfaction with school safety at the schools the child attends
through the scholarship program versus safety at the schools previously attended;
(16) Demonstrate such organization's financial viability, if such organization is to
receive donations of fifty thousand dollars or more during the school year, by filing with the
state treasurer before the start of the school year a surety bond payable to the state in an
amount equal to the aggregate amount of contributions expected to be received during the
school year or other financial information that demonstrates the financial viability of the
100 educational assistance organization.
101 2. The annual audit required under this section shall include:
102 (1) The name and address of the educational assistance organization;
103 (2) The name and address of each qualified student for whom a parent opened a
104 scholarship account with the organization;
105 (3) The total number and total dollar amount of contributions received during the
106 previous calendar year; and
107 (4) The total number and total dollar amount of scholarship accounts opened during
108 the previous calendar year.
109 3. The state treasurer shall:
110 (1) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws for data in the state treasurer's
111 possession;
112 (2) Collect all test results;
113 (3) Provide the test results and associated learning gains to the public via a state
114 website after the third year of test and test-related data collection. The findings shall be
115 aggregated by the students' grade level, gender, family income level, number of years of
116 participation in the scholarship program, and race; and
117 (4) Provide graduation rates to the public via a state website after the third year of test
118 and test-related data collection.
119 4. The state treasurer shall cause the following information to be posted on the state
120 treasurer's website annually, provided that no personally identifiable information of any
121 student is released:
122 (1) The number of students who have been awarded a scholarship to date and the
123 number of students who have been awarded a scholarship in the current school year;
124 (2) The number of scholarship recipients enrolled in each qualified school, along with
125 the number of recipients who qualify for free and reduced price lunch and the number of

HB 1748 5
126 recipients who receive special education services and the type of special education services
127 received. Such information shall be broken down by school year and the total to date;
128 (3) The total number of scholarship recipients who are eligible for free and reduced
129 price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and secondary education in
130 accordance with federal guidelines, broken down by school year and the total to date;
131 (4) The total number of scholarship recipients who have an individualized education
132 [plan] program (IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education
133 Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, broken down by school year and the total to
134 date;
135 (5) The number of scholarship recipients who have received a grant from each
136 educational assistance organization, broken down by school year and the total to date;
137 (6) The student test scores required to be posted online pursuant to subdivision (3) of
138 subsection 3 of this section;
139 (7) The results of the parent satisfaction survey required annually pursuant to
140 subdivision (15) of subsection 1 of this section;
141 (8) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant for all students who participate
142 in the program;
143 (9) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant for all students who participate
144 in the program and who have an IEP;
145 (10) The average duration of a student's participation in the program;
146 (11) The number of students who are in their first year of participation in the
147 program;
148 (12) A list of the educational assistance organizations that make contributions to the
149 empowerment scholarship accounts of students enrolled in each qualified school; and
150 (13) The total amount of money that has been remitted from qualified students'
151 empowerment scholarship accounts to each qualified school, broken down by school year and
152 the total aggregate amount.
153 5. An educational assistance organization may contract with private financial
154 management firms to manage scholarship accounts with the supervision of the state treasurer,
155 provided that all laws and regulations that apply to employees of such educational assistance
156 organization shall also apply to the actions of any employees of the management firm while
157 they are conducting work relating to the direct decision-making of the operation of such
158 educational assistance organization.
151.150. 1. For the purpose of levying school taxes, including taxes for school
purposes, as defined in section 163.011 for capital projects purposes, as authorized under
section 165.011, "and for other purposes", as defined in section 151.160, in the several
counties of this state, on the distributable property of the railroad company, the several county

HB 1748 6
commissions shall ascertain from the returns in the office of the county clerk the average rate
of taxation levied for school purposes for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes,
each separately by the several local school boards or authorities of the several school districts
throughout the county.
2. The average rate for school purposes shall be ascertained by adding together the
local rates of the several school districts in the county and by dividing the sum thus obtained
by the whole number of districts levying a tax for school purposes. The county clerk shall
cause to be charged to the railroad companies taxes for school purposes at the average rate on
the proportionate value of the railroad property so certified to the county commission by the
state tax commission, under the provisions of this chapter, and shall apportion the taxes for
school purposes, so levied and collected, among all the school districts in his county, the same
proportion that the September membership of a district, determined as provided in [(1) of
subdivision (8)] paragraph (a) of subdivision (12) of section 163.011, bears to the sum of
the September membership of all districts in the county.
3. The average rate levied for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes, each
separately, shall be ascertained by adding together the local rates of the several districts in the
county levying a tax for capital projects purposes, or for other purposes and by dividing the
sum thus obtained in each case by the whole number of districts in the county. The county
clerk shall cause to be charged to the railroad companies taxes for capital projects purposes,
or for other purposes, at the average rate on the proportionate value of the railroad
distributable property so certified to the county commission by the state tax commission,
under the provisions of this chapter, and the county commission shall apportion the taxes for
capital projects purposes, or for other purposes so levied and collected, among the several
school districts levying the taxes, in proportion to the amount of such taxes so levied in each
of the districts.
4. All local property owned or controlled by a railroad company lying in any school
district shall be taxed at the same rate as other property in the district, and the school taxes,
including taxes for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes thereon, shall go to the
district in which such property is situated.
163.011. As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Adjusted operating levy", the sum of tax rates for the current year for teachers'
and incidental funds for a school district as reported to the proper officer of each county
pursuant to section 164.011;
(2) "Average daily attendance", the quotient or the sum of the quotients obtained by
dividing the total number of hours attended in a term by resident pupils between the ages of
five and twenty-one by the actual number of hours school was in session in that term. To the
average daily attendance of the following school term shall be added the full-time equivalent

HB 1748 7
average daily attendance of summer school students. "Full-time equivalent average daily
attendance of summer school students" shall be computed by dividing the total number of
hours, except for physical education hours that do not count as credit toward graduation for
students in grades nine, ten, eleven, and twelve, attended by all summer school pupils by the
number of hours required in section 160.011 in the school term. For purposes of determining
average daily attendance under this subdivision, the term "resident pupil" shall include all
children between the ages of five and twenty-one who are residents of the school district and
who are attending kindergarten through grade twelve in such district. If a child is attending
school in a district other than the district of residence and the child's parent is teaching in the
school district or is a regular employee of the school district which the child is attending, then
such child shall be considered a resident pupil of the school district which the child is
attending for such period of time when the district of residence is not otherwise liable for
tuition. Average daily attendance for students below the age of five years for which a school
district may receive state aid based on such attendance shall be computed as regular school
term attendance unless otherwise provided by law;
(3) "Current operating expenditures":
(a) For the fiscal year 2007 calculation, current operating expenditures shall be
calculated using data from fiscal year 2004 and shall be calculated as all expenditures for
instruction and support services except capital outlay and debt service expenditures minus the
revenue from federal categorical sources; food service; student activities; categorical
payments for transportation costs pursuant to section 163.161; state reimbursements for early
childhood special education; the career ladder entitlement for the district, as provided for in
sections 168.500 to 168.515; the vocational education entitlement for the district, as provided
for in section 167.332; and payments from other districts;
(b) In every fiscal year subsequent to fiscal year 2007, current operating expenditures
shall be the amount in paragraph (a) of this subdivision plus any increases in state funding
pursuant to sections 163.031 and 163.043 subsequent to fiscal year 2005, not to exceed five
percent, per recalculation, of the state revenue received by a district in the 2004-05 school
year from the foundation formula, line 14, gifted, remedial reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair
share, and free textbook payments for any district from the first preceding calculation of the
state adequacy target;
(4) "District's tax rate ceiling", the highest tax rate ceiling in effect subsequent to the
1980 tax year or any subsequent year. Such tax rate ceiling shall not contain any tax levy for
debt service;
(5) "Dollar-value modifier", an index of the relative purchasing power of a dollar,
calculated as one plus fifteen percent of the difference of the regional wage ratio minus one,

HB 1748 8
provided that the dollar value modifier shall not be applied at a rate less than 1.0. As used in
this subdivision, the following terms mean:
(a) "County wage per job", the total county wage and salary disbursements divided by
the total county wage and salary employment for each county and the City of St. Louis as
reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce
for the fourth year preceding the payment year;
(b) "Regional wage per job":
a. The total Missouri wage and salary disbursements of the metropolitan area as
defined by the Office of Management and Budget divided by the total Missouri metropolitan
wage and salary employment for the metropolitan area for the county signified in the school
district number or the City of St. Louis, as reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of
the United States Department of Commerce for the fourth year preceding the payment year
and recalculated upon every decennial census to incorporate counties that are newly added to
the description of metropolitan areas; or if no such metropolitan area is established, then:
b. The total Missouri wage and salary disbursements of the micropolitan area as
defined by the Office of Management and Budget divided by the total Missouri micropolitan
wage and salary employment for the micropolitan area for the county signified in the school
district number, as reported by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States
Department of Commerce for the fourth year preceding the payment year, if a micropolitan
area for such county has been established and recalculated upon every decennial census to
incorporate counties that are newly added to the description of micropolitan areas; or
c. If a county is not part of a metropolitan or micropolitan area as established by the
Office of Management and Budget, then the county wage per job, as defined in paragraph (a)
of this subdivision, shall be used for the school district, as signified by the school district
number;
(c) "Regional wage ratio", the ratio of the regional wage per job divided by the state
median wage per job;
(d) "State median wage per job", the fifty-eighth highest county wage per job;
(6) "Free and reduced price lunch pupil count", for school districts not eligible for and
those that do not choose the USDA Community Eligibility Option, the number of pupils
eligible for free and reduced price lunch on the last Wednesday in January for the preceding
school year who were enrolled as students of the district, as approved by the department in
accordance with applicable federal regulations. For eligible school districts that choose the
USDA Community Eligibility Option, the free and reduced price lunch pupil count shall be
the percentage of free and reduced price lunch students calculated as eligible on the last
Wednesday in January of the most recent school year that included household applications to

HB 1748 9
determine free and reduced price lunch count multiplied by the district's average daily
attendance figure;
(7) "Free and reduced price lunch threshold" shall be calculated by dividing the total
free and reduced price lunch pupil count of every performance district that falls entirely above
the bottom five percent and entirely below the top five percent of average daily attendance,
when such districts are rank-ordered based on their current operating expenditures per
average daily attendance, by the total average daily attendance of all included performance
districts;
(8) "Gifted education pupil count", the number of pupils who qualify as gifted,
as gifted children are defined in section 162.675, and who are enrolled and have
participated in a state-approved gifted education program provided by the school
district by June first of the immediately preceding school year;
(9) "Limited English proficiency pupil count", the number in the preceding school
year of pupils aged three through twenty-one enrolled or preparing to enroll in an elementary
school or secondary school who were not born in the United States or whose native language
is a language other than English or are Native American or Alaskan native, or a native
resident of the outlying areas, and come from an environment where a language other than
English has had a significant impact on such individuals' level of English language
proficiency, or are migratory, whose native language is a language other than English, and
100 who come from an environment where a language other than English is dominant; and have
101 difficulties in speaking, reading, writing, or understanding the English language sufficient to
102 deny such individuals the ability to meet the state's proficient level of achievement on state
103 assessments described in [Public Law 107-10] the federal No Child Left Behind Act of
104 2001 (Pub. L. 107-110), the ability to achieve successfully in classrooms where the language
105 of instruction is English, or the opportunity to participate fully in society;
106 [(9)] (10) "Limited English proficiency threshold" shall be calculated by dividing the
107 total limited English proficiency pupil count of every performance district that falls entirely
108 above the bottom five percent and entirely below the top five percent of average daily
109 attendance, when such districts are rank-ordered based on their current operating expenditures
110 per average daily attendance, by the total average daily attendance of all included
111 performance districts;
112 [(10)] (11) "Local effort":
113 (a) For the fiscal year 2007 calculation, local effort shall be computed as the
114 equalized assessed valuation of the property of a school district in calendar year 2004 divided
115 by one hundred and multiplied by the performance levy less the percentage retained by the
116 county assessor and collector plus one hundred percent of the amount received in fiscal year
117 2005 for school purposes from intangible taxes, fines, escheats, payments in lieu of taxes and

HB 1748 10
118 receipts from state-assessed railroad and utility tax, one hundred percent of the amount
119 received for school purposes pursuant to the merchants' and manufacturers' taxes under
120 sections 150.010 to 150.370, one hundred percent of the amounts received for school
121 purposes from federal properties under sections 12.070 and 12.080 except when such
122 amounts are used in the calculation of federal impact aid pursuant to P.L. 81-874, fifty percent
123 of Proposition C revenues received for school purposes from the school district trust fund
124 under section 163.087, and one hundred percent of any local earnings or income taxes
125 received by the district for school purposes. Under this paragraph, for a special district
126 established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with a charter form of government
127 and with more than one million inhabitants, a tax levy of zero shall be utilized in lieu of the
128 performance levy for the special school district;
129 (b) In every year subsequent to fiscal year 2007, local effort shall be the amount
130 calculated under paragraph (a) of this subdivision plus any increase in the amount received
131 for school purposes from fines. If a district's assessed valuation has decreased subsequent to
132 the calculation outlined in paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the district's local effort shall be
133 calculated using the district's current assessed valuation in lieu of the assessed valuation
134 utilized in the calculation outlined in paragraph (a) of this subdivision. When a change in a
135 school district's boundary lines occurs because of a boundary line change, annexation,
136 attachment, consolidation, reorganization, or dissolution under section 162.071, 162.081,
137 sections 162.171 to 162.201, section 162.221, 162.223, 162.431, 162.441, or 162.451, or in
138 the event that a school district assumes any territory from a district that ceases to exist for any
139 reason, the department of elementary and secondary education shall make a proper
140 adjustment to each affected district's local effort, so that each district's local effort figure
141 conforms to the new boundary lines of the district. The department shall compute the local
142 effort figure by applying the calendar year 2004 assessed valuation data to the new land areas
143 resulting from the boundary line change, annexation, attachment, consolidation,
144 reorganization, or dissolution and otherwise follow the procedures described in this
145 subdivision;
146 [(11)] (12) "Membership" shall be the average of:
147 (a) The number of resident full-time students and the full-time equivalent number of
148 part-time students who were enrolled in the public schools of the district on the last
149 Wednesday in September of the previous year and who were in attendance one day or more
150 during the preceding ten school days; and
151 (b) The number of resident full-time students and the full-time equivalent number of
152 part-time students who were enrolled in the public schools of the district on the last
153 Wednesday in January of the previous year and who were in attendance one day or more
154 during the preceding ten school days, plus the full-time equivalent number of summer school

HB 1748 11
155 pupils. "Full-time equivalent number of part-time students" is determined by dividing the
156 total number of hours for which all part-time students are enrolled by the number of hours in
157 the school term. "Full-time equivalent number of summer school pupils" is determined by
158 dividing the total number of hours for which all summer school pupils were enrolled by the
159 number of hours required pursuant to section 160.011 in the school term. Only students
160 eligible to be counted for average daily attendance shall be counted for membership;
161 [(12)] (13) "Operating levy for school purposes", the sum of tax rates levied for
162 teachers' and incidental funds plus the operating levy or sales tax equivalent pursuant to
163 section 162.1100 of any transitional school district containing the school district, in the
164 payment year, not including any equalized operating levy for school purposes levied by a
165 special school district in which the district is located;
166 [(13)] (14) "Performance district", any district that has met performance standards
167 and indicators as established by the department of elementary and secondary education for
168 purposes of accreditation under section 161.092 and as reported on the final annual
169 performance report for that district each year; for calculations to be utilized for payments in
170 fiscal years subsequent to fiscal year 2018, the number of performance districts shall not
171 exceed twenty-five percent of all public school districts;
172 [(14)] (15) "Performance levy", three dollars and forty-three cents;
173 [(15)] (16) "School purposes" pertains to teachers' and incidental funds;
174 [(16)] (17) "Special education pupil count", the number of public school students with
175 a current individualized education program or services plan and receiving services from the
176 resident district as of December first of the preceding school year, except for special
177 education services provided through a school district established under sections 162.815 to
178 162.940 in a county with a charter form of government and with more than one million
179 inhabitants, in which case the sum of the students in each district within the county exceeding
180 the special education threshold of each respective district within the county shall be counted
181 within the special district and not in the district of residence for purposes of distributing the
182 state aid derived from the special education pupil count;
183 [(17)] (18) "Special education threshold" shall be calculated by dividing the total
184 special education pupil count of every performance district that falls entirely above the
185 bottom five percent and entirely below the top five percent of average daily attendance, when
186 such districts are rank-ordered based on their current operating expenditures per average daily
187 attendance, by the total average daily attendance of all included performance districts;
188 [(18)] (19) "State adequacy target", the sum of the current operating expenditures of
189 every performance district that falls entirely above the bottom five percent and entirely below
190 the top five percent of average daily attendance, when such districts are rank-ordered based
191 on their current operating expenditures per average daily attendance, divided by the total

HB 1748 12
192 average daily attendance of all included performance districts. The department of elementary
193 and secondary education shall first calculate the state adequacy target for fiscal year 2007 and
194 recalculate the state adequacy target every two years using the most current available data.
195 The recalculation shall never result in a decrease from the state adequacy target as calculated
196 for fiscal years 2017 and 2018 and any state adequacy target figure calculated subsequent to
197 fiscal year 2018. Should a recalculation result in an increase in the state adequacy target
198 amount, fifty percent of that increase shall be included in the state adequacy target amount in
199 the year of recalculation, and fifty percent of that increase shall be included in the state
200 adequacy target amount in the subsequent year. The state adequacy target may be adjusted to
201 accommodate available appropriations as provided in subsection 7 of section 163.031;
202 [(19)] (20) "Teacher", any teacher, teacher-secretary, substitute teacher, supervisor,
203 principal, supervising principal, superintendent or assistant superintendent, school nurse,
204 social worker, counselor or librarian who shall, regularly, teach or be employed for no higher
205 than grade twelve more than one-half time in the public schools and who is certified under the
206 laws governing the certification of teachers in Missouri;
207 [(20)] (21) "Weighted average daily attendance":
208 (a) For fiscal years prior to the 2026 fiscal year, paragraph (g) of this subdivision;
209 (b) For the 2026 fiscal year, the sum of nine-tenths multiplied by paragraph (g) of this
210 subdivision plus one-tenth multiplied by the weighted membership;
211 (c) For the 2027 fiscal year, the sum of eight-tenths multiplied by paragraph (g) of
212 this subdivision plus two-tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
213 (d) For the 2028 fiscal year, the sum of seven-tenths multiplied by paragraph (g) of
214 this subdivision plus three-tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
215 (e) For the 2029 fiscal year, the sum of six-tenths multiplied by paragraph (g) of this
216 subdivision plus four-tenths multiplied by the weighted membership;
217 (f) For the 2030 fiscal year and all subsequent fiscal years, the sum of five-tenths
218 multiplied by paragraph (g) of this subdivision plus five-tenths multiplied by the weighted
219 membership;
220 (g) The average daily attendance plus the product of twenty-five hundredths
221 multiplied by the free and reduced price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and reduced
222 price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five hundredths multiplied by the number
223 of special education pupil count that exceeds the special education threshold, plus the product
224 of six-tenths multiplied by the number of limited English proficiency pupil count that exceeds
225 the limited English proficiency threshold, plus beginning on July 1, 2027, the product of
226 six-tenths multiplied by the number of the district's gifted education pupil count. For
227 special districts established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with a charter form
228 of government and with more than one million inhabitants, weighted average daily attendance

HB 1748 13
229 shall be the average daily attendance plus the product of twenty-five hundredths multiplied by
230 the free and reduced price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free and reduced price lunch
231 threshold, plus the product of seventy-five hundredths multiplied by the sum of the special
232 education pupil count that exceeds the threshold for each county district, plus the product of
233 six-tenths multiplied by the limited English proficiency pupil count that exceeds the limited
234 English proficiency threshold, plus beginning on July 1, 2027, the product of six-tenths
235 multiplied by the number of the district's gifted education pupil count. None of the
236 districts comprising a special district established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a
237 county with a charter form of government and with more than one million inhabitants, shall
238 use any special education pupil count in calculating their weighted average daily attendance;
239 [(21)] (22) "Weighted membership", the membership plus the product of twenty-five
240 hundredths multiplied by the free and reduced price lunch pupil count that exceeds the free
241 and reduced price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five hundredths multiplied by
242 the number of special education pupil count that exceeds the special education threshold, plus
243 the product of six-tenths multiplied by the number of limited English proficiency pupil count
244 that exceeds the limited English proficiency threshold, plus beginning on July 1, 2027, the
245 product of six-tenths multiplied by the number of the district's gifted education pupil
246 count. For special districts established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with
247 more than one million inhabitants, weighted membership shall be the membership plus the
248 product of twenty-five hundredths multiplied by the free and reduced price lunch pupil count
249 that exceeds the free and reduced price lunch threshold, plus the product of seventy-five
250 hundredths multiplied by the sum of the special education pupil count that exceeds the
251 threshold for each county district, plus the product of six-tenths multiplied by the limited
252 English proficiency pupil count that exceeds the limited English proficiency threshold, plus
253 beginning on July 1, 2027, the product of six-tenths multiplied by the number of the
254 district's gifted education pupil count. None of the districts comprising a special district
255 established under sections 162.815 to 162.940 in a county with more than one million
256 inhabitants shall use any special education pupil count in calculating their weighted
257 membership.
166.131. The county commission in each county shall administer the county school
fund of the county. In each county wherein the annual distribution of the liquidated capital of
the county school fund has not been ordered by the voters pursuant to sections 166.151 to
166.161, the proceeds of the fund shall be invested by the county commission in registered
bonds of the United States, or in bonds of the state or in approved bonds of any city or school
district thereof, or in bonds or other securities the payment of which is fully guaranteed by the
United States government and shall be preserved as a county school fund. Annually, on or
before September thirtieth, in each county of the state all interest accruing from the

HB 1748 14
investment of the capital of the county school fund, if any, the clear proceeds of all penalties
and fines collected for any breach of the penal laws of the state, the net proceeds from the sale
of estrays, and all other money lawfully coming into the fund, shall be collected and
distributed to the school districts of the county by the county clerk in the same proportion that
the September membership of a school district, determined as provided in [(1) of subdivision
(8)] paragraph (a) of subdivision (12) of section 163.011 bears to the sum of the September
membership of all the districts in the county. He shall immediately after making the
apportionments enter them in a book to be kept for that purpose, and shall furnish each district
clerk a copy of the apportionment. The county treasurer shall pay over to the treasurer of the
school board of every district in the county the amount due each respective district. The clear
proceeds of all forfeitures collected for any breach of the penal laws of the state distributed
for education shall be transferred to the school building revolving fund.
✔